District of Columbia statutes.
42-1902.21

Declarant’s easement over common elements for purpose of improvements, etc.

Subject to any restrictions and limitations the condominium instruments may specify, the declarant shall have a transferable easement over and on the common elements for the purpose of making improvements on the submitted land and any additional land pursuant to the provisions of those instruments and of this chapter, and for the purpose of doing all things reasonably necessary and proper in connection therewith.

History

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title II, § 221, 23 DCR 9532b

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-1901.02, § 42-1902.23, and § 42-1903.09.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1831.
1973 Ed., § 5-1231.